src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-paccod_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - paččođ: # ML checked

    paččođ+V+Inf: paččođ
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačodâm
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pačodah
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paččood
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pačodeen
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pačoodvettee
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pačodává
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pačodeh
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: paččood
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pačodim
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pačodij
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pačodii
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pačodiččim
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pačodičij
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pačodižžeem
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pačodiš
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: paččood
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pačodâm
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pačodižžii
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: pačodâm
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: paččoodhánnáá
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: pačodem
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: paččoodmân
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: paččoodmin
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: paččoodmist
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: paččooddijn
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg1: paččooddijnân
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg2: paččooddijnâd
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg3: paččooddijnis
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: paččooddijn
    paččođ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačostâm
    paččođ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačottâm
    paččođ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačoškuáđám
